Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA HOCKEY HALL OF FAME.new text end new text begin $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Minnesota Hockey Hall of Fame Inc., a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to construct, furnish, and equip a facility to be known as the Minnesota Hockey Hall of Fame in the city of Inver Grove Heights, which will house a museum, ice rink, performance hall, event space, and other amenities. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin INVER GROVE HEIGHTS; PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $5,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of Inver Grove Heights to design and construct public infrastructure to support both construction of a new facility to be known as the Minnesota Hockey Hall of Fame and economic development in the city of Inver Grove Heights. For the purposes of this section, "public infrastructure" includes mass grading and excavation, clean water systems, sanitary sewer systems, stormwater systems, roads, trails, and sidewalks. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $5,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end